Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202181-538
Violations; penalty.

Anyone violating any of the provisions of sections 81-501.01 to 81-531, for which no other specific penalty is provided, shall be deemed guilty of a Class V misdemeanor, and each day's noncompliance shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XXI, § 14, p. 749;

C.S.1922, § 8158;

C.S.1929, § 81-5537;

R.S.1943, § 81-538;

Laws 1947, c. 313, § 2, p. 950;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 290;

Laws 1980, LB 810, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 40, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB37, § 4.
August 28, 2021